Mississippi statutes. Title 57. Planning, Research and Development
Article 7. Mississippi Small Business Financing Act.
§ 57-10-255.
Tax-exempt status of company; state’s right to remaining assets upon dissolution; mortgages, leases, etc., tax-exempt; time limit on ad valorem tax exemption; new ad valorem tax exemptions where tax levied for school district purposes.

The company is hereby declared to be performing a public function and to be a public body corporate and a political subdivision of the state. Accordingly, the income, including any profit made on the sale thereof from all bonds issued by the company, shall at all times be exempt from all taxation by the state or any public subdivision thereof. If, after all indebtedness and other obligations of the company are discharged the company is dissolved, its remaining assets shall inure to the benefit of the state.

All mortgages or deeds of trust executed as security therefor, all lease, loan or purchase agreements made pursuant to the provisions hereof, all purchases required to establish the enterprise and financed by proceeds from bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 10, Title 57, Mississippi Code of 1972, shall likewise be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi except the contractors’ tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 and the taxes levied by Section 27-65-24(1)(b), and all projects financed by the proceeds from such bonds and the revenue derived from any lease thereof shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi, except the tax levied by Sections 27-65-21 and 27-65-24(1)(b), and except the tax levied under Chapter 7, Title 27, Mississippi Code of 1972. From and after July 1, 2002, there shall be no new ad valorem tax exemption authorized under this section unless approved by the appropriate local taxing authority.

The time of any ad valorem tax exemption provided for hereunder shall not exceed a total of ten (10) years, which shall run from the date of the completion of the project. In no event shall the term of the ad valorem tax exemption provided for hereunder be limited, terminated or otherwise affected by payment in full of the bonds issued under this chapter or by the change from a leasehold to a fee title in the enterprise financed with bonds issued under this chapter.

From and after July 1, 1990, there shall be no new exemption under this section from ad valorem taxes levied for school district purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 28; Laws, 1987, ch. 464, § 5; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 71, § 16; Laws, 1992, ch. 518, § 5; Laws, 1995, ch. 355, § 3; Laws, 2002, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 449, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 57-10-257.
Investment in bonds; bonds as security for deposits.

The bonds issued by and under the authority of this article by the company are declared to be legal investments in which all public officers or public bodies of the state, its political subdivisions, all municipalities and municipal subdivisions, all insurance companies and associations, and other persons carrying on insurance business, all banks, bankers, banking associations, trust companies, savings associations, including savings and loan associations, building and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking business, all administrators, guardians, executors, trustees and other fiduciaries, and all other persons who are now or may later be authorized to invest in bonds or in other obligations of the state, may invest funds, including capital, in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are also hereby made securities which may be deposited with and received by all public officers and bodies of the state or any agency or political subdivision of the state and all municipalities and public corporations for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or other obligations of the state is now or may be later authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-259.
Annual report.

The company shall, within one hundred twenty (120) days of the close of each fiscal year, submit an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Governor. The clerk of each house of the Legislature shall receive a copy of the report by making a request for it to the company. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement for the company during the fiscal year it covers.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 30, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 57-10-261.
Construction of article.

Nothing contained in this article is to be construed as a restriction or limitation upon any powers which the company might otherwise have under any other law of the state. Insofar as the provisions of this article are inconsistent with the provisions of any other law, the provisions of this article shall be controlling, and the powers conferred by this article shall be regarded as supplemental and additional to powers conferred by any other laws. No proceedings, notice or approval shall be required for the issuance of any bonds or any instrument or the security therefor, except as provided in this article.

The provisions of this article shall be liberally construed to accomplish the purposes of this article.

The powers granted and the duties imposed in this article shall be construed to be independent and severable. If any one or more sections, subsections, sentences or parts of any of this article shall be adjudged unconstitutional or invalid, such adjudication shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remaining provisions thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the specific provisions so held unconstitutional or invalid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1985, ch. 450, § 31, eff from and after July 1, 1985.